Utah statutes.
10-3-506.   How the vote is taken.

A roll call vote shall be taken and recorded for all ordinances, resolutions, and any action which would create a liability against the municipality and in any other case at the request of any member of the governing body by a "yes" or a "no" vote and shall be recorded. Every resolution or ordinance shall be in writing before the vote is taken.

